Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2607.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Conveyance in Hampden Township, Cumberland County.(a) Authorization for conveyance.--The Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey to Friends of Peace Church, a Pennsylvania nonprofit corporation, the following tract of land, together with any improvements thereon, known as the Peace Church, situate in Hampden Township, Cumberland County, for $1, on terms and conditions to be established in an agreement of sale.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) consists of the following:ALL THAT CERTAIN parcel of land situate in Hampden Township, 1234567891011121314151617181920 County of Cumberland, Pennsylvania, bounded and described as follows, to wit:BEGINNING at a nail located at the intersection of the center lines of L.R. 21079, known as St. John's Road, and L.R. 507, known as Trindle Road; thence south 64 degrees 57 minutes 30 seconds west 88.04 feet to a point; by an arc to the right with a radius of 22,918.31 feet a distance of 84.37 feet along the center line of Trindle Road to a nail; thence north 27 degrees 27 minutes 30 seconds west 116.71 feet to a nail; thence north 26 degrees 39 minutes 00 seconds west 273.15 feet parallel to a stone wall to an iron pin; thence north 69 degrees 23 minutes 30 seconds east a distance of 78.90 feet to a nail in the center line of St. John's Road; thence by an arc along the center lien of St. John's Road with a radius of 1,910.08 feet a distance of 144.44 feet to a nail; thence south 39 degrees 45 minutes 30 seconds east 325.75 feet to the place of BEGINNING.CONTAINING 1.135-acres of land, more or less.Having erected thereon a two-story stone church building known as Peace Church, or sometimes designated as the German Reformed Church of Peace of Hampden Township, and other improvements.BEING the same property conveyed to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, acting through the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission, by deed from The Penn Central Conference of the United Church of Christ, Inc., and St. John's Lutheran Church, Inc., dated August 18, 1969, and recorded in the Office of the Recorder of Deeds of the County of Cumberland at Deed Book K23, Pages 258-264.(c) Subject to certain matters.--The conveyance shall be made under and subject to all lawful and enforceable easements, 20260HB2607PN3530 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 servitudes and rights of others, including, but not confined to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Covenants, conditions and restrictions.--The Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission may include in the deed of conveyance any covenants, conditions or restrictions on the property, including a right of reversion, as it deems to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(e) Easements.--The Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission is hereby authorized, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, to grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed, or to retain any easements from the property to be conveyed, as the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.(f) Deed.--The conveyance shall be made by special warranty deed to be executed by the Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(g) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to this conveyance shall be borne by the grantee. The conveyance under this section shall be exempt from the realty transfer tax established under Article XI-C of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(h) Expiration.--If the conveyance authorized herein is not completed within two years after the effective date of this subsection, the authority contained herein shall expire.Section 2. Effective date.20260HB2607PN3530 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2607PN3530 - 4 - 1